xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.aff
FLAG long
SFX tM N 31
SFX tM outre outant foutre
SFX tM outre outu foutre
SFX tM outre outus foutre
SFX tM outre outue foutre
SFX tM outre outues foutre
SFX tM outre ous foutre
SFX tM outre out foutre
SFX tM outre outons foutre
SFX tM outre outez foutre
SFX tM outre outent foutre
SFX tM outre outais foutre
SFX tM outre outait foutre
SFX tM outre outions foutre
SFX tM outre outiez foutre
SFX tM outre outaient foutre
SFX tM outre outrai foutre
SFX tM outre outras foutre
SFX tM outre outra foutre
SFX tM outre outrons foutre
SFX tM outre outrez foutre
SFX tM outre outront foutre
SFX tM outre outrais foutre
SFX tM outre outrait foutre
SFX tM outre outrions foutre
SFX tM outre outriez foutre
SFX tM outre outraient foutre
SFX tM outre oute foutre
SFX tM outre outes foutre
SFX tM outre ous foutre
SFX tM outre outons foutre
SFX tM outre outez foutre

SFX tU N 4
SFX tU istre issu tistre
SFX tU istre issus tistre
SFX tU istre issue tistre
SFX tU istre issues tistre

SFX uA Y 46
SFX uA tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tant/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tu/L'D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tus/D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tue/L'D'Q' tre
SFX uA tre tues/D'Q' tre
SFX uA ttre ts/n'q'j'l'm't' ttre
SFX uA ttre t/n'q'l'm't's' ttre
SFX uA tre ts/n'q'j'l'm't' embatre
SFX uA tre t/n'q'l'm't's' embatre
SFX uA tre tons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tais/n'q'j'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tiez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre taient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tis/n'q'j'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tit/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tîmes/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tîtes/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tirent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trai/n'q'j'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tras/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tra/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trons/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre trez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tront/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trais/n'q'j'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre trait/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre trions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre triez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre traient/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre te/n'q'j'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tes/n'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tisse/n'q'j'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tisses/n'q'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre tît/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre tissions/n'q'l't' tre
SFX uA tre tissiez/n'q'l'm' tre
SFX uA tre tissent/n'q'l'm't's' tre
SFX uA tre s/n'l'm't' tre
SFX uA tre ts/n'l'm' embatre
SFX uA tre tons/n'l' tre
SFX uA tre tez/n'l'm' tre

SFX uC Y 43
SFX uC battre battre/m't's' battre
SFX uC battre battant/m't's' battre
SFX uC battre battu battre
SFX uC battre battus battre
SFX uC battre battue battre
SFX uC battre battues battre
SFX uC battre bats/m't' battre
SFX uC battre bat/s' battre
SFX uC battre battons battre
SFX uC battre battez battre
SFX uC battre battent/s' battre
SFX uC battre battais/m't' battre
SFX uC battre battait/s' battre
SFX uC battre battions battre
SFX uC battre battiez battre
SFX uC battre battaient/s' battre
SFX uC battre battis/m't' battre
SFX uC battre battit/s' battre
SFX uC battre battîmes battre
SFX uC battre battîtes battre
SFX uC battre battirent/s' battre
SFX uC battre battrai/m' battre
SFX uC battre battras/t' battre
SFX uC battre battra/s' battre
SFX uC battre battrons battre
SFX uC battre battrez battre
SFX uC battre battront/s' battre
SFX uC battre battrais/m't' battre
SFX uC battre battrait/s' battre
SFX uC battre battrions battre
SFX uC battre battriez battre
SFX uC battre battraient/s' battre
SFX uC battre batte/m's' battre
SFX uC battre battes/t' battre
SFX uC battre battisse/m' battre
SFX uC battre battisses/t' battre
SFX uC battre battît/s' battre
SFX uC battre battissions battre
SFX uC battre battissiez battre
SFX uC battre battissent/s' battre
SFX uC battre bats/t' battre
SFX uC battre battons battre
SFX uC battre battez battre

SFX uD Y 33
SFX uD battre battre/s' battre
SFX uD battre battant/s' battre
SFX uD battre battu battre
SFX uD battre battus battre
SFX uD battre battue battre
SFX uD battre battues battre
SFX uD battre bat/s' battre
SFX uD battre battons battre
SFX uD battre battez battre
SFX uD battre battent/s' battre
SFX uD battre battait/s' battre
SFX uD battre battions battre
SFX uD battre battiez battre
SFX uD battre battaient/s' battre
SFX uD battre battit/s' battre
SFX uD battre battîmes battre
SFX uD battre battîtes battre
SFX uD battre battirent/s' battre
SFX uD battre battra/s' battre
SFX uD battre battrons battre
SFX uD battre battrez battre
SFX uD battre battront/s' battre
SFX uD battre battrait/s' battre
SFX uD battre battrions battre
SFX uD battre battriez battre
SFX uD battre battraient/s' battre
SFX uD battre batte/s' battre
SFX uD battre battît/s' battre
SFX uD battre battissions battre
SFX uD battre battissiez battre
SFX uD battre battissent/s' battre
SFX uD battre battons-nous battre
SFX uD battre battez-vous battre

SFX vA Y 42
SFX vA ettre ettre/n'q'd'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettant/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre is/L'D'Q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ise/L'D'Q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ises/D'Q' mettre
SFX vA ettre ets/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre et/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettons/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettiez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettaient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre is/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre it/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre îmes/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre îtes/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre irent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrai/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettras/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettra/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrons/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettront/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrais/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrait/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettrions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettriez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettraient/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ette/n'q'j'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettes/n'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre isse/n'q'j'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre isses/n'q'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ît/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre issions/n'q'l't' mettre
SFX vA ettre issiez/n'q'l'm' mettre
SFX vA ettre issent/n'q'l'm't's' mettre
SFX vA ettre ets/n'l'm't' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettons/n'l' mettre
SFX vA ettre ettez/n'l'm' mettre

SFX vC Y 42
SFX vC mettre mettre/m't's' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettant/m't's' mettre
SFX vC mettre mis mettre
SFX vC mettre mise mettre
SFX vC mettre mises mettre
SFX vC mettre mets/m't' mettre
SFX vC mettre met/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettais/m't' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettait/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettions mettre
SFX vC mettre mettiez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettaient/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mis/m't' mettre
SFX vC mettre mit/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mîmes mettre
SFX vC mettre mîtes mettre
SFX vC mettre mirent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrai/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettras/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettra/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrons mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettront/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrais/m't' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrait/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettrions mettre
SFX vC mettre mettriez mettre
SFX vC mettre mettraient/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mette/m's' mettre
SFX vC mettre mettes/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre misse/m' mettre
SFX vC mettre misses/t' mettre
SFX vC mettre mît/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre missions mettre
SFX vC mettre missiez mettre
SFX vC mettre missent/s' mettre
SFX vC mettre mets mettre
SFX vC mettre mettons mettre
SFX vC mettre mettez mettre
