xall/x60/809689-grammalecte-fr-thunderbird/src/content/dictionaries/fr-FR-classic-reform/fr-FR-classic-reform.dic
abattre/uA
admettre/vA
battre/uA
combattre/uA
commettre/vA
compromettre/vA
contrebattre/uA
contrefoutre/tM
débattre/uA
décommettre/vA
démettre/vA
ébattre/uC
embatre/uA
embattre/uA
émettre/vA
entrebattre/uD
entremettre/vC
foutre/tM
mainmettre/vA
mettre/vA
omettre/vA
permettre/vA
promettre/vA
rabattre/uA
réadmettre/vA
rebattre/uA
réémettre/vA
refoutre/tM
remettre/vA
retransmettre/vA
soubattre/uA
soumettre/vA
télétransmettre/vA
tistre/tU
transmettre/vA
